dictsource/ne_rules
.group ठ
	ठ	t.#V
        _L22) ठ (हL22_           t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (हL22            t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (हL22_        t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (हL22         t.#      // generated
        L22) ठ (हL22_            t.#      // generated
        L22) ठ (हL22             t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (L21ाL21         t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (मा_             t.#      // generated
        _L22) ठ (मा              t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (मा_          t.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ठ (मा           t.#      // generated
	ठ (B	t.#
	ठँ	t.#V~'
	ठॅ	t.#V~'
	ठ (्ठ	t.#,
	्) ठ (_	t.#@/
?1	ठ (_	t.#

.group ड
	ड	d.V
        _L22) ड (हL22_           d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (हL22            d.       // generated
        _L22L22) ड (हL22_        d.       // generated
        _L22L22) ड (हL22         d.       // generated
        L22) ड (हL22_            d.       // generated
        L22) ड (हL22             d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (L21ाL21         d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (मा_             d.       // generated
        _L22) ड (मा              d.       // generated
        _L22L22) ड (मा_          d.       // generated
        _L22L22) ड (मा           d.       // generated
	ड (B	d.
	// After a vowel ड is the flap [ɽ]: गाडा, करोड, अड्कल (WikiPron 48 of 53).
	L01) ड	r.V
	L01) ड (B	r.
	L01) ड (_	r.
	L02) ड	r.V
	L02) ड (B	r.
	L02) ड (_	r.
	डँ	d.V~'
	डॅ	d.V~'
	ड (्ड	d.,
	ड (्य	d.:
	्) ड (_	d.@/
?1	ड (_	d.
	ड़	d.V:
	ड़ (B	d.:
	ड़ँ	d.:V~'
	ड़ॅ	d.:V~'

.group ढ
	ढ	d.#V
        _L22) ढ (हL22_           d.#      // generated
        _L22) ढ (हL22            d.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ढ (हL22_        d.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ढ (हL22         d.#      // generated
        L22) ढ (हL22_            d.#      // generated
        L22) ढ (हL22             d.#      // generated
        _L22) ढ (L21ाL21         d.#      // generated
        _L22) ढ (मा_             d.#      // generated
        _L22) ढ (मा              d.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ढ (मा_          d.#      // generated
        _L22L22) ढ (मा           d.#      // generated
	ढ (B	d.#
	// After a vowel ढ is the breathy flap [ɽʱ] (WikiPron 23 of 24).
	L01) ढ	r.hV
	L01) ढ (B	r.h
	L01) ढ (_	r.h
	L02) ढ	r.hV
	L02) ढ (B	r.h
	L02) ढ (_	r.h
	ढँ	d.#V~'
	ढॅ	d.#V~'
	्) ढ (_	d.#@/
?1	ढ (_	d.#
	ढ़	d.#V:	// nukta
	ढ़ (B	d.#	// nukta

.group ण
	ण	n.V	// Phoneme adjustment suggested
        _L22) ण (हL22_           n.       // generated
        _L22) ण (हL22            n.       // generated
        _L22L22) ण (हL22_        n.       // generated
        _L22L22) ण (हL22         n.       // generated
        L22) ण (हL22_            n.       // generated
        L22) ण (हL22             n.       // generated
        _L22) ण (L21ाL21         n.       // generated
        _L22) ण (मा_             n.       // generated
        _L22) ण (मा              n.       // generated
        _L22L22) ण (मा_          n.       // generated
        _L22L22) ण (मा           n.       // generated
	ण (B	n.
?1	ण (_	n.
	्) ण (_	n.@/
	ण (C	n.@

.group त
	त	tV
        _L22) त (हL22_           t        // generated
        _L22) त (हL22            t        // generated
        _L22L22) त (हL22_        t        // generated
        _L22L22) त (हL22         t        // generated
        L22) त (हL22_            t        // generated
        L22) त (हL22             t        // generated
        _L22) त (L21ाL21         t        // generated
        _L22) त (मा_             t        // generated
        _L22) त (मा              t        // generated
        _L22L22) त (मा_          t        // generated
        _L22L22) त (मा           t        // generated
	त (B	t
	तँ	tV~'
	तॅ	tV~'
	्) त (_	t@/
	त (्त	t,
	त (्य	t:
?1	त (_	t,

.group थ
	थ	t#V
        _L22) थ (हL22_           t#       // generated
        _L22) थ (हL22            t#       // generated
        _L22L22) थ (हL22_        t#       // generated
        _L22L22) थ (हL22         t#       // generated
        L22) थ (हL22_            t#       // generated
        L22) थ (हL22             t#       // generated
        _L22) थ (L21ाL21         t#       // generated
        _L22) थ (मा_             t#       // generated
        _L22) थ (मा              t#       // generated
        _L22L22) थ (मा_          t#       // generated
        _L22L22) थ (मा           t#       // generated
	थँ	t#V~'
	थॅ	t#V~'
	थ (B	t#
	्) थ (_	t#@/
	थ (्य	t#,
?1	थ (_	t#

.group द
	द	dV
        _L22) द (हL22_           d        // generated
        _L22) द (हL22            d        // generated
        _L22L22) द (हL22_        d        // generated
        _L22L22) द (हL22         d        // generated
        L22) द (हL22_            d        // generated
        L22) द (हL22             d        // generated
        _L22) द (L21ाL21         d        // generated
        _L22) द (मा_             d        // generated
        _L22) द (मा              d        // generated
        _L22L22) द (मा_          d        // generated
        _L22L22) द (मा           d        // generated
	दँ	dV~'
	दॅ	dV~'
	द (B	d
	द (्द	d,
	द (्व	d:
	द (्ध	d:
?1	द (_	d
	्) द (_	d@/

.group ध
	ध	d#V
        _L22) ध (हL22_           d#       // generated
        _L22) ध (हL22            d#       // generated
        _L22L22) ध (हL22_        d#       // generated
        _L22L22) ध (हL22         d#       // generated
        L22) ध (हL22_            d#       // generated
        L22) ध (हL22             d#       // generated
        _L22) ध (L21ाL21         d#       // generated
        _L22) ध (मा_             d#       // generated
        _L22) ध (मा              d#       // generated
        _L22L22) ध (मा_          d#       // generated
        _L22L22) ध (मा           d#       // generated
	धँ	d#V~'
	धॅ	d#V~'
	ध (B	d#
?1	ध (_	d#
	्) ध (_	d#@/

.group न
	न	nV
        _L22) न (हL22_           n        // generated
        _L22) न (हL22            n        // generated
        _L22L22) न (हL22_        n        // generated
        _L22L22) न (हL22         n        // generated
        L22) न (हL22_            n        // generated
        L22) न (हL22             n        // generated
        _L22) न (L21ाL21         n        // generated
        _L22) न (मा_             n        // generated
        _L22) न (मा              n        // generated
        _L22L22) न (मा_          n        // generated
        _L22L22) न (मा           n        // generated
	नँ	nV~'
	नॅ	nV~'
	न (B	n
?1	न (_	n
	्) न (_	n@/
	न (्न	n,
	Cै) न (_	n@
	CBदि) न (_	n@
	ए) न (_	n@
	CB) न (ु_	n	// the following ु already supplies [u]; nu; here doubled it (बस्नु -> bVsnu;u)

.group ऩ
	ऩ	n'a	// Phoneme adjustment suggested

.group प
	प	pV
        _L22) प (हL22_           p        // generated
        _L22) प (हL22            p        // generated
        _L22L22) प (हL22_        p        // generated
        _L22L22) प (हL22         p        // generated
        L22) प (हL22_            p        // generated
        L22) प (हL22             p        // generated
        _L22) प (L21ाL21         p        // generated
        _L22) प (मा_             p        // generated
        _L22) प (मा              p        // generated
        _L22L22) प (मा_          p        // generated
        _L22L22) प (मा           p        // generated
	पँ	pV~'
	पॅ	pV~'
	प (B	p
?1	प (_	p
	प (्प	p,
	प (्य	p:
	्) प (_	p@/

.group फ
	फ	p#V
        _L22) फ (हL22_           p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (हL22            p#       // generated
        _L22L22) फ (हL22_        p#       // generated
        _L22L22) फ (हL22         p#       // generated
        L22) फ (हL22_            p#       // generated
        L22) फ (हL22             p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (L21ाL21         p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (मा_             p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (मा              p#       // generated
        _L22L22) फ (मा_          p#       // generated
        _L22L22) फ (मा           p#       // generated
	फँ	p#V~'
	फॅ	p#V~'
	फ (B	p#
	फ (्न	p#:
?1	फ (_	p#
	्) फ (_	p#@/

.group ब
	ब	bV
        _L22) ब (हL22_           b        // generated
        _L22) ब (हL22            b        // generated
        _L22L22) ब (हL22_        b        // generated
        _L22L22) ब (हL22         b        // generated
        L22) ब (हL22_            b        // generated
        L22) ब (हL22             b        // generated
        _L22) ब (L21ाL21         b        // generated
        _L22) ब (मा_             b        // generated
        _L22) ब (मा              b        // generated
        _L22L22) ब (मा_          b        // generated
        _L22L22) ब (मा           b        // generated
	बँ	bV~'
	बॅ	bV~'
	ब (B	b
	ब (्ब	b:
?1	ब (_	b
	्) ब (_	b@/

.group भ
	भ	b#V
        _L22) भ (हL22_           b#       // generated
        _L22) भ (हL22            b#       // generated
        _L22L22) भ (हL22_        b#       // generated
        _L22L22) भ (हL22         b#       // generated
        L22) भ (हL22_            b#       // generated
        L22) भ (हL22             b#       // generated
        _L22) भ (L21ाL21         b#       // generated
        _L22) भ (मा_             b#       // generated
        _L22) भ (मा              b#       // generated
        _L22L22) भ (मा_          b#       // generated
        _L22L22) भ (मा           b#       // generated
	भँ	b#V~'
	भॅ	b#V~'
	भ (B	b#
?1	भ (_	b#
	भ (्य	b#,
	्) भ (_	bh@/

.group म
	म	mV
        _L22) म (हL22_           m        // generated
        _L22) म (हL22            m        // generated
        _L22L22) म (हL22_        m        // generated
        _L22L22) म (हL22         m        // generated
        L22) म (हL22_            m        // generated
        L22) म (हL22             m        // generated
        _L22) म (L21ाL21         m        // generated
        _L22) म (मा_             m        // generated
        _L22) म (मा              m        // generated
        _L22L22) म (मा_          m        // generated
        _L22L22) म (मा           m        // generated
	मँ	mV~'
	मॅ	mV~'
	म (B	m
	म (्म	m,
	म (्य	m:
	्) म (_	m@/

.group य
	य	jV
        _L22) य (हL22_           j        // generated
        _L22) य (हL22            j        // generated
        _L22L22) य (हL22_        j        // generated
        _L22L22) य (हL22         j        // generated
        L22) य (हL22_            j        // generated
        L22) य (हL22             j        // generated
        _L22) य (L21ाL21         j        // generated
        _L22) य (मा_             j        // generated
        _L22) य (मा              j        // generated
        _L22L22) य (मा_          j        // generated
        _L22L22) य (मा           j        // generated
	यँ	jV~'
	यॅ	jV~'
	य (B	j
?1	य (_	j@2
	्) य (_	j@/

.group र
	र	rV
        _L22) र (हL22_           r        // generated
        _L22) र (हL22            r        // generated
        _L22L22) र (हL22_        r        // generated
        _L22L22) र (हL22         r        // generated
        L22) र (हL22_            r        // generated
        L22) र (हL22             r        // generated
        _L22) र (L21ाL21         r        // generated
        _L22) र (मा_             r        // generated
        _L22) र (मा              r        // generated
        _L22L22) र (मा_          r        // generated
        _L22L22) र (मा           r        // generated
	रँ	rV~'
	रॅ	rV~'

	र (B	r
	्) र (c	r'v:
	र्‍	r':
	Cे) र (_	r@
	र (्C	r	// pre-consonant r is single: WikiPron 111/114 (गर्नु [gʌrnu])
	Cे) र (_	r@
	रर (_	r@3r@2

.group ऱ	// rra
	ऱ	r'V	// Phoneme adjustment suggested
	ऱ (B	r'
	्) ऱ (_	r@/
